South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  SECTION 1. Notwithstanding another provision of law, each member of the Colleton County Transportation Committee, in performance of his duties, shall be allowed and paid from Colleton County "C" fund revenues the sum of one hundred dollars for each meeting at which he is in attendance. The chairman of the committee shall be allowed and paid from the Colleton County "C" fund revenue the sum of one hundred seventy-five dollars for each meeting at which he is in attendance. SECTION 2. The Colleton County Transportation Committee shall receive the payment authorized herein upon issuance of approved vouchers by its chairman; provided, however, the chairman may not approve vouchers in any single fiscal year which vouchers authorize payment for more than eighteen meetings per fiscal year for each member of the committee. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----